New York, session 2025-2026, A6526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (i) and (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 2 of section 245.10 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by section 1 3 of part HHH of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, are amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (i) When a defendant is in custody during the pendency of the criminal 6 case, the prosecution shall perform its initial discovery obligations 7 [within twenty calendar days after the defendant's arraignment on an 8 indictment, superior court information, prosecutor's information, infor- 9 mation, simplified information, misdemeanor complaint or felony 10 complaint] no later than sixty days before the first scheduled trial 11 date. 12 (ii) When the defendant is not in custody during the pendency of the 13 criminal case, the prosecution shall perform its initial discovery obli- 14 gations [within thirty-five calendar days after the defendant's arraign- 15 ment on an indictment, superior court information, prosecutor's informa- 16 tion, information, simplified information, misdemeanor complaint or 17 felony complaint] no later than sixty days before the first scheduled 18 trial date. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10225-01-5